Utah statutes.
51-9-302.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Infrastructure and Economic Diversification Investment Account" means the Infrastructure and Economic Diversification Investment Account created in Section 51-9-303.

(2)  "Permanent state trust fund" means the permanent state trust fund created under Utah Constitution Article XXII, Section 4.

